Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1808
Licensed dietitian nutritionist, defined.

Licensed dietitian nutritionist means a person who is licensed to practice medical nutrition therapy pursuant to the Uniform Credentialing Act and who holds a current license issued by the department pursuant to section 38-1813.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 630;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 31.